District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.15

No negative amortization.

A lender shall not make a covered loan with a payment schedule with regular periodic payments that causes the principal balance to increase.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 215, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 215 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).